Georgia, session 2025_26, SB347.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
An Act implementing the Brunswick and Glynn County Development Authority, approved
April 2, 1963 (Ga. L. 1963, p. 2826), as amended, particularly by an Act approved March 31,
1987 (Ga. L. 1987, p. 5391), which Act was enacted pursuant to an amendment to the
Constitution set out at Ga. L. 1962, p. 810, is amended by revising Sections 1 and 2 as
follows:
S. B. 347
- 1 -

LC 47 3632
"SECTION 1.
(a) The Brunswick and Glynn County Development Authority shall consist of a board of
governors composed of five members.
(b) Four members of the board of governors, designated as Seats 1 through 4, shall be
appointed by joint resolution of the governing authorities of Glynn County and the City of
Brunswick, as provided for herein. The fifth member, designated as Seat 5, shall be either
the chairperson or vice-chairperson of the Glynn County Board of Commissioners, as
designated by said board of commissioners prior to the start of each term for such seat.
(c) No later than ten days after July 1, 2025, the Brunswick and Glynn County
Development Authority shall designate which current members occupy Seats 1 through 4
and shall submit such designations to the governing authorities of Glynn County and the
City of Brunswick.
(d) The members occupying Seats 1 through 4 as of June 30, 2025, shall continue to serve
as follows:
(1) The term of the member occupying Seat 1 shall expire on June 30, 2026;
(2) The term of the member occupying Seat 2 shall expire on June 30, 2027;
(3) The term of the member occupying Seat 3 shall expire on June 30, 2028; and
(4) The term of the member occupying Seat 4 shall expire on June 30, 2029.
The members holding Seats 1 through 4 as of June 30, 2025, shall be eligible to serve one
additional successive four-year term, if reappointed.
(e) Upon the expiration of the terms set forth in subsection (d) of this section, members for
Seats 1 through 4 shall be appointed pursuant to the following joint appointment process
to staggered terms of four years, beginning on July 1 and ending on June 30 four years
later. For each appointment or successor appointment for Seats 1 through 4, the authority
shall submit the name of one candidate to the governing authorities of Glynn County and
the City of Brunswick for joint approval. If the candidate is not acceptable to the
S. B. 347
- 2 -

LC 47 3632
governing authorities of Glynn County and the City of Brunswick, the authority shall
submit a second candidate. If three consecutive candidates for a particular appointment are
not found to be acceptable, the governing authorities of Glynn County and the City of
Brunswick, by resolution, shall appoint an individual to the corresponding seat. Members
serving in Seats 1 through 4 may serve no more than two successive four-year terms, after
which the member must wait at least two years before becoming eligible for reappointment.
If any member occupying Seats 1 through 4 serves less than a full four-year term, that
partial term shall not count toward the member's term limit, and such member shall be
eligible to serve two additional successive four-year terms.
(f) Seat 5 shall consist of either the chairperson or vice-chairperson of the Glynn County
Board of Commissioners and shall be appointed by the Glynn County Board of
Commissioners, with an initial term beginning August 1, 2025, and ending December 31,
2025. Thereafter, Seat 5, consisting of either the chairperson or vice-chairperson of the
Glynn County Board of Commissioners, shall be appointed annually by said board for a
term of one year beginning January 1, with a maximum of four successive one-year terms.
(g) Any member of the board of governors, including the county-appointed member
occupying Seat 5, may be removed for cause for willful misconduct, legal or ethical
violations, failure without good cause to comply with the authority's attendance policy,
failure without good cause to partake in the authority's new member orientation within the
first three months of the beginning of his or her term, or a proven breach of oath that causes
material harm to the authority. Prior to removal, the member shall receive written notice
detailing the specific grounds for removal and shall be given an opportunity to respond.
The authority shall conduct a hearing at which the member shall have the opportunity to
present evidence, respond to the allegations, and be heard by the board. Removal shall
require a unanimous vote of the remaining four board members upon a documented finding
of cause following such hearing. Any member removed pursuant to this subsection shall
be permanently ineligible for reappointment to the board of governors. The authority shall
S. B. 347
- 3 -

LC 47 3632
adopt and include in its by-laws clear and reasonable written rules and policies consistent
with this subsection, including a formal attendance policy, a process for providing notice
of absences, a process for responding to alleged noncompliance, and a process for removal
in the event of noncompliance. Such policies shall also establish procedural guidelines for
any hearing conducted pursuant to this subsection.
(h) If, at the expiration of the term of any member, a successor has not been appointed, the
member whose term has expired shall continue to hold office until his or her successor is
duly appointed and qualified.
SECTION 2.
(a) All members of the board of governors shall be taxpayers and residents of Glynn
County, Georgia. Except for the member occupying Seat 5, no member shall be an officer
or employee of Glynn County or the City of Brunswick.
(b) The board of governors shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson and
another as vice-chairperson. The board shall also elect a secretary-treasurer. The
secretary-treasurer shall not be required to be a member of the board of governors. The
member occupying Seat 5 may not be elected as an officer of the board of governors.
(c) If a vacancy occurs on the board of governors due to death, resignation, or for any
other reason prior to the expiration of a member's term, the vacancy shall be filled in the
same manner as the original appointment for the corresponding seat. A member appointed
to fill a vacancy shall serve the remainder of the unexpired term.
(d) Upon appointment, each member of the authority shall take an oath before a notary
public, or other officer authorized to administer oaths, that he or she will truly and
faithfully perform the duties of a member of the authority."
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2025.
S. B. 347
- 4 -

LC 47 3632
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 347
- 5 -